






A Word from the President - TMU

















Your browser does not support Javascript.  Some functions will be missing.






:::
Home
|
Site Map
|
Contact Us
|
中文版 

  



TMU

:::About TMUA Word from the PresidentOrganizationFacts & numbersTMU Map (Office location & Food around TMU)TransportationOur Partners


:::
A Word from the President 
 

TMU's President, Prof. Yun Yen


Since Taipei Medical University's founding in 1960, it has gone through different stages embryonic, pioneering, planting roots, expansion and sustainable
development. Its history of 54 years, over half a century, is a proud one. 

Over this time frame TMU has advanced step by step, overcoming roadblocks and hurdles, building today's eminent institution of one school and three
hospitals, and decisively striding toward an ever better tomorrow. Looking back at the trials and tribulations, we are filled with gratitude toward our founders, the health professionals and teachers who have worked diligently together over the years, sacrificing on behalf of TMU, nurturing so many outstanding health professionals.


TMU's campus is located in the new urban center of the flourishing Xinyi District. Taipei 101 is just a short distance away. The university has seven
colleges: the College of Medicine, College of Oral Medicine, College of Pharmacy, College of Nursing, College of Public Health and Nutrition, College of
Medical Science and Technology, and College of Humanities and Social Sciences.
There are 12 departments and 23 graduate institutes at TMU, as well as the affiliated TMU Hospital, Wan Fang Medical Center and Shuang Ho Hospital, with a total of 3000 beds. The total number of faculty and staff members surpasses 6000, and there are over 6000 student as well. 

Over the past half-century TMU has educated many thousands of individuals of outstanding ability. Our alumni number over 38,000, and they are invariably among the elite in their fields. They are spread across the globe and work in health-care facilities, research institutes, government agencies and businesses. Possessing a deep sense of solidarity and a strong commitment to the development of their alma mater, they are TMU's strongest supporters and our most treasured resource.


In recent years, with TMU faculty, students, and alumni making concerted efforts, the university has experienced rapid development, and we have risen steadily in the QS World University Rankings. In 2014, TMU was ranked 46th among Asian universities and 363rd among all the world's universities. We also entered the ranks of the world's top 100 in the medicine category, and into the top 200 in the pharmacy & pharmacology category. This is a clear
demonstration of how the school's stellar performance has captured international attention and respect.


TMU has also been successful in cultivating its international outlook and promoting international academic exchanges, entering into sister school relationships with numerous well-known foreign universities, fostering close cooperation and exchanges, and significantly improving its standard of teaching and research. We are not complacent: we will continue to add to this solid foundation in our quest for ever better results.


Looking to the future, TMU will build on the energy and dynamism built up over five decades, and we will leverage these to achieve more innovative breakthroughs in teaching, research and service. We are confident that TMU's destiny is to march out from Taiwan onto the global stage, and to become a truly world-class university.






:::


標準版RSs 2.x套裝About TMUA Word from the PresidentOrganizationFacts & numbersTMU Map (Office location & Food around TMU)TransportationOur PartnersAdmissionsFall AdmissionTuition & FeesFinancial Aid & ScholarshipsInternational degree programsFacilitiesNew StudentsCurrent StudentsNewsEventsCampus Life


Login
:::


ID:

PW:



















TMU
www









Quick links FB Links  Student Life  Join TMU  Campus Map  International Office  Admissions  

 


 Sorbonne's Lutomski speaks on proteomics 20 Sept.  Read more










HOSPITALS


Taipei Medical University Hospital
Wanfang Medical Center
Shuang Ho Hospital
TMU Lihuili Hospital (Ningbo, China)



TMU Outwards

The World at TMU (yearbook)
 TMU Main page (Chinese)
 TMU Alumni News (Chinese)


ABOUT US

TERMS OF USE
 SECURITY POLICY
 STATISTICS
 ADMIN



ADDRESS
 250 Wuxing St. Taipei 11031
    



No. of visits：













// 











Shen Yun Performing Arts










































SHEN YUN PERFORMING ARTS














English     


 中文正體 


 中文简体 


 日本語 


 한국어 


 Česky 


 Deutsch 


 Español 


 Français 


 Italiano 


 Nederlands 


 Svenska 


 Việt 


 Indonesia 


 Polski 

 
Shop



                Search




Search








Tickets





Shen Yun Performing Arts




















      Reviving 5,000 Years of Civilization





Tickets
About







What’s New


Videos






                              Shen Yun Symphony Orchestra Reviews                          
MORE


Videos






                              Shen Yun Symphony Orchestra 2017                          
MORE


News






                              Shen Yun 2017 Vacation Photos                          
MORE


Blog






                              Bestowing the Tao – the Story of Lao-Tzu                          
MORE











      “Extraordinary costumes and vigorous physicality.”      
        —Denver Post              


      “A nimble mastery.”      
        —Chicago Tribune              


      “Superb! Every performance was stunning.”      
        —WNYC              




Tickets
Reviews









view all cities



Don’t see nearby shows?
Click to search by zip code






Trailer Video


Trailer Video




































Ecosway Yen Mee Yun H31A, Healthcare product in Mantin



























HomeNegeri SembilanWellness ProductsEcosway Yen Mee Yun H31A Share on Facebook





Ecosway Yen Mee Yun H31A 5  Review  Maps Edit   (6.00/10)  Rating DetailRank 34 of 2224 in Wellness Products  Profession :Healthcare product  Contact Info :  Click to view Address :No 27 (Ground Floor) Jalan Bukit Belian Taman Bukit Belian, Mantin, 71700, Negeri Sembilan WebsiteMore Ecosway branches[MAIN] EcoswayEcosway Tan Huey Shya F039Ecosway Cheng Lai Chin H47AEcosway Rekha Sahadevan Rekha AP Sahadevan D82BEcosway Chong Feei Yin G35BEcosway Zeros One Enterprise E54AEcosway Affable Enterprise Nor Sheila Binti Basri C91BEcosway Normala Bt Ibrahim JHQEcosway F & S Family Enterprise Noor Farahin Binti Esa LC015Ecosway AMK Miracle Beauty Shoppe Enterprise K092Ecosway Shun Shun Plus Enterprise Sz Siew Yin K024Ecosway Pang Chin You C44BEcosway Sim Lee See JH94Ecosway Perfect Twelve Enterprise Lim Hui Ji D093Ecosway Sunrise HC Enterprise F40AEcosway L & L Two Enterprise Liew Siew Lee D05AEcosway PML JB Marketing Phoon Mee Ling F081Ecosway Yoon Bee Trdg Lim Chin Bee JH92Ecosway Synergy NR Marketing Nurhidayah Tan Bt Abdullah F76AEcosway Mui Lang Trading Chai Mui Lang J086Ecosway Najwa Ariana Peregrine Yeo K91AEcosway Tai Fei See JA13Ecosway Chee Hoo Tan Trading Tan Chee Hoo E76BEcosway Hui Lee Wellness Shirley Pang C057Ecosway Ng Marketing & Trading Gan Kwee Geok D45AEcosway Tan Shirley Enterprise G07AEcosway Lim Yee Jenn E03BEcosway Zhong Zhi Enterprise Lee Ai Ling K094Ecosway EZAHAM Trading Azizah Binti Abdul Majid F50BEcosway Easy Life Resources Kuan Yet Lee JH95Ecosway Noridah Binti Yahya G029Ecosway See Toh Kim Tin D15BEcosway Tey Lay Chuan JH32Ecosway Shun Shun Marketing & Services F062Ecosway Low Wai Cheng J092Ecosway Siew Lih Enterprise Se Siew Lih G61BEcosway Golden Ting Enterprise Gan Lai Kim E04BEcosway Best Q Enterprise Lim Chek Ling D074Ecosway St Shine Marketing Sharon Tan Kim Moi C089Ecosway Doreen Lee JH68Ecosway Perniagaan Tang Quan Choo Kwan Lian C72AEcosway Guan Ah Lin JH97Ecosway Toh Hong Chin Enterprise Toh Hong Chin J91AEcosway Lau Kim Kiat Trading Kho Ling Ling H60AEcosway BH Global Marketing Lau Swee Lun J077Ecosway SK Kee Enterprise Kee Sock Koon K089Ecosway Cash Pramasi Enterprise Mangayarkarasy AP Rajo K013Ecosway T & L Yue Enterprise H085Ecosway TW Global Network Rio Lim Kok Ching K14AEcosway KH Chai Trading Chai Ka Hui LC014Ecosway Chee Sow Moi K045Ecosway AA Global Trading Nurhasninda Binti Hashim E65CEcosway Lilian TPL TradingNo 1 & 1A F019Ecosway Success Store Trading Wong Lan Yin H90AEcosway Hyper Linkz Ent Ishak Bin Ali JH98Ecosway Zamzahlina Binti Zakaria E64CEcosway Advance One Marketing Lee Li Fong D065Ecosway LXE Global Network Lim Wan Ping K033Ecosway Norani bt Saimon JHXEcosway F & F Eco Infinity Mohd Faiz Akmal Bin Amran K090Ecosway Teh Siew Pin D061Ecosway LJ Progressive Enterprise Mdm Lee C095Ecosway Find A Way Lim Hui Kien H18AEcosway Angie Ng Trading Ng Lan Chin E035Ecosway OJR Success Enterprise Oh Jia Rong K095Ecosway Gaochin Enterprise Tay See Yin F044Ecosway Twin Butterfly Mdm Cham Pey Shin D038Ecosway Lee Yi Leng H14AEcosway Ler Wan Choo F58BEcosway DL Center JA21Ecosway KYC Enterprise Kee Hui Hui H93BEcosway Happiness Life Marketing Chee Tsae Shya D092Ecosway Deluxe Health Solution Enterprise F007Ecosway Lau Yan Hwa F047Ecosway Yueh Kok Leong JH82Ecosway PS Mei Enterprise Phoon Siew Mei F057Ecosway Chan Mei Fong D22AEcosway Rafidah Binti Haron E61AEcosway Sahar Mahani KD37Ecosway Shirley Leong Yock Thai KD24Ecosway Johari b Jalil KD34Ecosway Khoo Pek See Enterprise Khoo Pek See E27CEcosway Pad Life Trading & Services F036Ecosway NP Bestary Trading Cheng Joo Nee KD40Ecosway Nutri Well Enterprise Sai Wei Gian K064Ecosway Ooi & Go Enterprise Ooi Soo Poh E026Ecosway KSH Sutra Enterprise Kee Siew Hua D54AEcosway MLB System Network Tan Swee King D060Ecosway MN Solid Enterprise Ooi Mong Nee F86AEcosway Tan Tiang Por KD49Ecosway Aly One Enterprise Ang Lue Yie K072Ecosway Ekaterina Enterprise Leong Wan Sin D40AEcosway Mdm Cheng Joo Nee G015Ecosway OTF Vision Bright Enterprise Sharon Ooi Teng Fong G01AEcosway Great Line Success Enterprise Ng Ai Me KD55Ecosway Pang Hooi Fuan J082Ecosway C N Y Siew Smart Enterprise Yong Siew Siew F98AEcosway WCACD Trading Tan Bee Choon E018Ecosway Lim Weng Heng KD32Ecosway Canny Trading Mdm Ong Lily D019Ecosway I One Success Enterprise Hoo Phung Lean F090Ecosway Siti Indah Enterprise Mahanun Bt Che Ismail G14AEcosway D Lapan Puluh Enterprise F063Ecosway Seri Cahaya Impian Enterprise Rohaizan Binti Zaharia G072Ecosway Haslinda Binti Omar E007Ecosway WNA First Trading Wan Hafizah Bt Wan Abdullah G49AEcosway Reena Adne Binti Abdul Rahim K084Ecosway Noni Izzati Marketing & Trading H067Ecosway Fauziah Bt Yusoff KT02Ecosway Memory Link Network Lee Geok Lian F089Ecosway Kibe Trading Chua Geok Kiat J008Ecosway Pan Siew Huei KTZEcosway Wan Abdul Halim Bin Wan Abdullah K10AEcosway Merge Dreams Enterprise Nor Aini H10BEcosway Syabas Ent Ms Koo KTIEcosway Zahyati DGM Enterprise Wan Faizahyati Binti Wan Yunus J67AEcosway Nik Zakiah Binti Nik Mohamed @ Nik Ismail K067Ecosway Norizan Awang Enterprise Norizan Binti Awang D072Ecosway Sinar Rezeki Solution Nurulhaiza Bt Bakhari H70AEcosway Eazyway Trdg Yusnita & Rosal Wani KT06Ecosway Two Hans Enterprise Low Peis Ha H066Ecosway Honey Rich Resources Siti Ruhani Binti Mansor G50DEcosway Lim Siow Chui H11AEcosway Enriches Enterprise Sam Fong Yee E52BEcosway Tech Empire Jane Tan D030Ecosway Vvo Enterprise Lok Chooi Thing K082Ecosway Concorde Retail Centre Go Sheau Zhen D81CEcosway Nuthree Enterprise Tan Goh Kien K15AEcosway Ang Jia Tsyr C65BEcosway Fortune Hill Marketing Shareen Gan Mei Poh C48BEcosway Maetrivii Resources C40GEcosway Sshunley Fuat Enterprise Selina Seow D23CEcosway Mentari Kejora Maju Norillah K086Ecosway Yishuen TradingSerena Ng K028Ecosway Desire Sale & Trading Lee Yoke Yean D78CEcosway Hew Wai Yuen C53BEcosway Kays Lovely Store Khairiah H89BEcosway Cheah Ming Lay F074Ecosway Good Merit Marketing & ServicesNg Ai Ling K059Ecosway AD Creative Solution Trading Goh Kim Mee C58AEcosway Liu Jan Hui J89AEcosway Siti Norhayati Binti Mohd Khalid K085Ecosway Unipharm Enterprise Wong Seu Sin M008Ecosway Wong Mooi Kwai FT42Ecosway Multiways Enterprise Chen Wan Chin E06AEcosway Ekeshiwei Enterprise Yap Li Yun K018Ecosway NBF Enterprise Ng Biau Fen K047Ecosway Low Poon Kong FTOEcosway Hybrid Concept Enterprise Wong Mei Lee K074Ecosway Yewwi Services Chuah Yew Wi G091Ecosway LIN LIT JENG Lin Lit Jeng K48AEcosway Rig Century Enterprise Yap Foo Siong J53AEcosway Lau Kin Sum E17AEcosway Cosmo E Biz Ginny Wong F82AEcosway Creative E Biz Mdm Ooi Seoh Teng C063Ecosway KCP Global Enterprise Loh Chee Cheng H22CEcosway Doris Koo Enterprise G66AEcosway Philantam Enterprise Ms Phoo Mei Lin D033Ecosway Super AA Enterprise Choo Ngeok Yean F094Ecosway Ms Chong Sit Mei Jackie C031Ecosway Chen Mooi Ngiok G004Ecosway IMD Trading Ismaliah Binti MD Deni H015Ecosway Chong Tsuey Shin H016Ecosway HNC Excellence Enterprise Ummi Hasirah E73AEcosway One Mast Enterprise Nur Hidayatul Rohaini E43BEcosway Angie Ng Seet Lin C92AEcosway Wong Mei Chia J85BEcosway Thye Kim Chow J48BEcosway Yong Hua Leng E16AEcosway Wendy Chiew MCEEcosway TF Resources Enterprise Farahaini G82AEcosway ELKH Ent Sharon Koay F026Ecosway AVATAR Enterprise Wan Zur Ain Binti Amran G18CEcosway Judy Huang Enterprise Huang Fong Chuen K081Ecosway Fennie Q Enterprise D44AEcosway Link Ent Ms Yee MCIEcosway Naadee Enterprise Kalaiarasi AP D Muthusamy K042Ecosway CF Twenty Six Worldwide Network G62BEcosway ABC Agency Mr Churn NSJEcosway Koh Choon Hian J62BEcosway Yen Mee Yun H31AEcosway TLM Trdg, Doris Tee NS24Ecosway Lin Fui Ting C78BEcosway Lee Beng Chu D89AEcosway Skill Synergy Marketing & Trading Thilagawati C99AEcosway Moment Lifestyle Enterprise Mdm Chow Hui Shi & Mr Cheong Chun Fatt NS44Ecosway ZD Grand Marketing Nuradzilla Bt Ismail J014Ecosway Yee Sow Liang J12AEcosway Infinite Global Marketing Seen Wai Kee C86BEcosway Roshisham Global Network Rosmawaty Bt Hashim G20AEcosway Nor Diana Binti Fachruddin G19CEcosway Chew Chee Hin Mantin NSZEcosway Cosmart Ent Mrs Churn NS25Ecosway KFML Harvest Trading Chong Mei Li F48AEcosway Jenny Enterprise Lim Chien Ye D094Ecosway Yee Mee Tin F14BEcosway GM Global Marketing Men Swee Ying E05AEcosway JJ Garuda Marketing Prem Nanthini AP Selvarajah E31AEcosway Mok Ah Moi Malisa NS37Ecosway Solochana ap Supppramaniam NS36Ecosway YW Lim TradingLim Yoke Wan F038Ecosway Noria Binti Kassim H32AEcosway Eng Peak Leng PHXEcosway Yap Wai Man J30AEcosway Bahariah Binti Baharuddin G027Ecosway Great Prosperity Enterprise Koh Soon Heng LC010Ecosway Kamilah Binti Abdul Rashid F20BEcosway DM Rich Resources Noor Diyana Binti Mohamed Zukri E37AEcosway Liza Beauty & Healthcare Norhalizawati G09BEcosway Luxury Award Enterprise Siti Azita H21AEcosway Akira Eva Enterprise Asmahani H12BEcosway Saitdatulaini bt Aminollah PH31Ecosway Impressive Expectations EnterpriseJolene Wong Sit Wah E040Ecosway Mazilawati Manshor G024Ecosway Elin Ecos Solution C79AEcosway Joan AY Enterprise Au Yong Pei San K012Ecosway Yenhui Enterprise H049Ecosway JWL Shop Enterprise Sow Yian Chun D86AEcosway RIFAT Resources Norlina Binti Amin K077Ecosway Cheong Yoke Peng G28BEcosway Ilyana Hakimi Bt Mohd Rasidi J030Ecosway Sam Mei Kei J94AEcosway Inn Gate Mktg Beverlyn Gan Yee Inn PH45Ecosway Shee Shuh Hong LC009Ecosway OYL Enterprise Ong Yee Ling G46BEcosway Micarushiz Marketing Gan Shiz Shiz D14AEcosway Xin En Cheng Enterprise D017Ecosway Sim Ang Tee PHWEcosway Joanne Chua Enterprise Chua Siu Yun D066Ecosway Cosway Mentakab Enterprise Mah Chew Yee LC011Ecosway Hashimah Binti Hashim F34BEcosway Khor Choon Meng PGEEcosway LYN Dynamic Venture Seah Ai Lyn C38EEcosway Chern Yuh Woei Chern Yuh Woei LC013Ecosway Eco Living Enterprise Heng Seok Nai F45AEcosway Tan Mui Hong PG53Ecosway TLH Unique Enterprise Tan Lim Hua PG73Ecosway Lee Bee Choo PG40Ecosway GG Enterprise Ng Goon Ghee J38AEcosway BCY Trading F068Ecosway UK Marketing Yong Yik Wei K057Ecosway JS Generation Enterprise Helen Lim D039Ecosway Groway Venture Chuah Choo Han G88CEcosway Bio Dews Enterprise Lim Siew Hong K099Ecosway Pinnacle Care Enterprise Ang Kooi Ching F66AEcosway Treasure March Enterprise Lim Siem Lang K096Ecosway C & F Network Fong Sau Kuen K062Ecosway Rainbow Resources G012Ecosway Zaimax Resources Angelin Ong Ai Zee E050Ecosway Veronica Chung Yin May PG43Ecosway Affniaga Marketing Fahir Bin Zulkifli J52AEcosway T & T Ecos EnterpriseToh Kim Lian K065Ecosway Alphabet Ventures Yeoh Bee Ling E99AEcosway Edpat Ent Patsy & Eddie PG46Ecosway Loh Agency Loh Seok Eng M002Ecosway Mdm Laura Dulah Anak Kaoh PG78Ecosway Chong Yen Mei K31AEcosway Leong Pek Sin PG50Ecosway JT Rich Enterprise Ho Lay Tee PG88Ecosway Cosgee Ent Benny Lim Kau Ngee PG51Ecosway Harvest Land Enterprise Joel Lim Chooi Pheng C03AEcosway Trueglobal Venture Ng Chi Ling G45AEcosway Hasnah Binti Saad F095Ecosway HT Plus Network Wan Huei Tyng C28BEcosway Dynamic Global Network Cannice Chow H42BEcosway Ailee Enterprise Teow Ai Lee J09AEcosway Tan Sing Hoock PG28Ecosway LD Dynamics Enterprise Lida Binti Daliman H045Ecosway Choo Mei Lee PGKEcosway Bethel Enterprise G010Ecosway Yellow Belle Venture Cassandra Wong Suet Ling E012Ecosway Kai Ju Enterprise Tan Kai Ju C41BEcosway Truelife Network Ch'ng Gan Tsin K097Ecosway Tad Network Ng Huey Wing M001Ecosway Southern Star Venture Choh Khar Ling F01BEcosway RC Stayhealthy Enterprise Norhasizasuriati Mohd Hassan C59BEcosway Ho Poh Leng K58AEcosway NN Yen Enterprise F065Ecosway Ve Light Marketing Lai Soon Nee LC007Ecosway Super MJ Marketing Lee Foong Foong G90AEcosway NN Seventy Five Ent H029Ecosway Maxwell Marketing & Trading F033Ecosway Low Lin Nah G077Ecosway Chin Sau Ling PK52Ecosway Tan Swee Peoh H97AEcosway Smart Conjunction Trading Ng Siew Siew F13AEcosway Canmis Poon Yee Hwa H13AEcosway Soong Yoke Kim G76AEcosway HSC Enterprise Celine Hooi Sow Chun LC016Ecosway Loo Yoke Lin F35AEcosway Liew Shiow Yn H095Ecosway Cherrypinky Trading Ng Choi Yen J11AEcosway Enl Shine Network Enterprise Cik Eva Shafinaz E014Ecosway E Best Marketing Chuah Kui Huan H37AEcosway Super Success Marketing Janice Lee PK88Ecosway Wellness Growth Lai Yiet Yew J21AEcosway North Way Ent Chan Ai Li PK68Ecosway Lau Chooi Yoke G25AEcosway Lau Yoke Ying PK51Ecosway SH Chin Marketing F053Ecosway Panca Mas Ent Mdm Loke Wai Fong PK86Ecosway Tung Mei Leng G075Ecosway WYK Ten Enterprise Wong Yuet Ping K001Ecosway Lee Suan Sim PK78Ecosway Asmah bt Arifin PK65Ecosway Chuah Saw Kim G68AEcosway Lim Mee Lean PK73Ecosway Beauty Colour Shop Goo Yen Nee D20AEcosway Bright Perfect Enterprise G098Ecosway Esuccess Enterprise F027Ecosway Perniagaan Crace E Centre F092Ecosway Diamond Trading Tan Swee Peoh F91AEcosway Chan Chow Kit K021Ecosway E Manjoi One Shop Enterprise Tan Yoke Hoon E021Ecosway Soong Yoke Kim May PK71Ecosway E Choice Services & Resources Ser Zee Yin D32AEcosway Koay Bee Lean PK69Ecosway Aimaan Trading & Services Nurul Aiman Binti Ahmad H28BEcosway Chew Choon Mui D84AEcosway Kong Shiang Shiun PK83Ecosway Northern Global Rich Norkhairy Binti Mohd Ghazali H59AEcosway Ang Guat Moe PK33Ecosway JE Seiko EnterpriseChow Yoke Lim F97CEcosway Srimej Marketing Enterprise H038Ecosway Lim Meng Oi PK59Ecosway E-Way Progress Marketing Ooi Chai Lein PK72Ecosway SK Tan Enterprise Tan Siew Kheng PK89Ecosway Karen Chew Chun Hui PK90Ecosway Hor Swee Lin PK58Ecosway Pro Health Vision Enterprise Teoh Chew Hon M007Ecosway Haz Chandan Trading F006Ecosway Leong Kai Seng PKHEcosway Khew Lan Ying PK25Ecosway Teoh Choon Hai KD47Ecosway Paris Link NetworkOng Siew Hui E01AEcosway Lim Swee Guan KD30Ecosway Ann Loo KD35Ecosway Khalid Mhd Yunus KD31Ecosway Penny Direct Sales H034Ecosway Yong Wai Leng Trading J054Ecosway E Network Mktg Stanley SB38Ecosway Christina Lee Kiok Ching SBGEcosway Adeline Su Lee Ling J028Ecosway Aishah Tan Ai Ti E063Ecosway Alizah Binti Jilit G59AEcosway Lai Bing Yein C94AEcosway Cosmos Wonder Sdn Bhd Stephen Ha & Edward Ha SB53Ecosway Fiona Anak Vivian Raya E23CEcosway Angela Wu Si Yi H68AEcosway EL Marketing Edna Lo Zi Ying G39BEcosway Jurmani Binti Mohammad F77AEcosway E-Lo Network Lo Vun Yee G067Ecosway Soh Pei Jing K068Ecosway Theresa Tsang Lai Chun SB49Ecosway Kong Min Fung SB22Ecosway E-Station Shopper E094Ecosway Hazel Vivian Eric @ Faezareena Koroh H002Ecosway Careway Chin Suk Yee D29AEcosway V & S Marketing E091Ecosway Star World Network Chea Fui Nyin J016Ecosway Ho Sui Yin SBOEcosway KKL DYNAMICS MARKETING Khoo Key Ling K016Ecosway Tee Piak Hiong E022Ecosway Kong Mui Jin F083Ecosway Wong Fui Yen E09AEcosway Chin Fui Yee C98AEcosway Andy Tan Sui Kim SBFEcosway Jade Enterprise Faridah @ Heldah Binti Dzulkifli G070Ecosway Manjit's Shoppe Manjit Kaur Kalsi J26AEcosway May Tsen Luu Yee F018Ecosway Fung Mee Ling SB47Ecosway Ho Choi Yen F28AEcosway JC & Associates Jane Chee Nyuk Mui J023Ecosway Lovely Network Shim Sing Yee K044Ecosway Tsen Lip Fung SB35Ecosway Wong Oi Lan SB31Ecosway Chong Fui Shu SB23Ecosway Ding Seng Enterprise Lee Eman K093Ecosway Ann N Flavia Anne Kiu Yen Chin C17AEcosway TJB Worldwide Network Jane Wong C050Ecosway Success Micron Enterprise Ng Chiew Peng J046Ecosway I-Ken Trading Yong Chia Pei E045Ecosway Sales & Redemption SW59Ecosway Winnie Sim SWTEcosway Chew Pao Cheng J015Ecosway Sat Network Mktg Annie Tiong Choon Lian SWNEcosway Mdm Chong Chen Chen C096Ecosway Wong Ling Yien SW39Ecosway Lau Mee Ngo LC005Ecosway Ken-Way Ent Grace Sung SW26Ecosway P.P.K Marketing Pang Peck Kun E25AEcosway Mei Kui Trading Liew Mei Kui SW45Ecosway May and Ron Enterprise Mary Lu J18AEcosway Christina Teng Wang Fei J099Ecosway Lily Teo SWKEcosway D'Lotus Enterprise Lok Min Wah K040Ecosway Best Buy Centre Tiong Siu Jin SW34Ecosway Eworks Network Lau Ping Chung G055Ecosway Premier Selection Enterprise Tan Mong Hiong@Tan Boon Hiong D051Ecosway Yvonne Ko Sui Ling Enterprise Mdm Ko Sui Ling C081Ecosway Qing Enterprise Chang Sung Ching K038Ecosway My Cosway Sim Kui Kee & Choo Han Siong SW51Ecosway Hybrid Xtrahealth Enterprise Voon Wee Nee J080Ecosway Chong Kar Fun D25BEcosway Maranata Anak Majakatar H61BEcosway Christopher Tiong Koh Hin SWQEcosway Josephine Enterprise Josephine Wong SW60Ecosway First Fruit Law Eng Kiat LC006Ecosway Emily Anak Damasus C42AEcosway Temuka Mktg Wong Leh Hung SW35Ecosway Escare Enterprise Lim Shuk Wui H058Ecosway Dai Chuang Trading Company G036Ecosway Extreme Efficient Enterprise G031Ecosway Whitnie Enterprise Voon Hui Ni LC004Ecosway Yu Jing Jing D24BEcosway Kar L.N.C Enterprise Lee Siaw Hui J031Ecosway Ho Ai Lee Enterprise H033Ecosway Priscilla Enterprise Miri G032Ecosway My Way Enterprise Margaret Kong King Hiong J37AEcosway Century Ent Albert Goh Han Siang & Su Mei Sieng SW50Ecosway Chen Min Choo H026Ecosway Khoo Ent Hii Chee Huong & Helynna Khoo G005Ecosway Hock Jie Enterprise Ting Siu Hiong J010Ecosway VMart MY Co Phang Yun Eng F80BEcosway Choo Pick Wen G85AEcosway S.E Enterprise Wong Siew Eng J064Ecosway T L Enterprise Agnes Wong Tong Ling G84BEcosway Sheila Ting Chieh E10BEcosway Alice Wong Enterprise Wong Su Gin D97AEcosway Wong Ling Ngo H08AEcosway Tay Eng May E067Ecosway Eng Hui Trading Wong Miew Chee LC003Ecosway Mary Yip Enterprise Mary Yip Choi Choi C085Ecosway Teng Wan Ling F016Ecosway Essentials Global Marketing Lau Pei Yun H87AEcosway V.V And K MarketingChin Siaw Ying E086Ecosway Chung Enterprise E088Ecosway Peter Ent Peter Kong Sing Hock SWJEcosway H.K Company Iris Mui Tze En E82BEcosway Bong Siao Zhe K19AEcosway Helen Chin Nyuk Moi SW37Ecosway Diana Chang Pyng Pyng F051Ecosway G87A Enterprise Moh Niann Rong G87AEcosway Winnie Wong Enterprise Winnie Wong D018Ecosway DMW Enterprise Wong Tai Ling H056Ecosway Hu Chai Lan SW43Ecosway Goldharvest Enterprise Tong Suk Kiong D069Ecosway Ng Ing Hong Trading J13AEcosway ELL Enterprise Elisa Lie K083Ecosway E Bella Enterprise Nor Elia Binti Hassan J004Ecosway Rika Bina Resources Rika Binti Tahir J42AEcosway Ling Lee Eng D85BEcosway Swan Stockist Low Poh Soon D080Ecosway Jeannie Lo Enterprise Lo Jen Ni M005Ecosway RS Dynamics Enterprise Salsury Binti Selamat E093Ecosway YL Winners Enterprise Yong Poh Ling D56AEcosway Nortafsiah Binti Kamaruddin E47BEcosway LJY Global Enterprise Lee Jiah Yeng H30BEcosway NTY Enterprise Tan Ann Nee E033Ecosway Jeffri Chong Kim Seng Bin Abdullah C39BEcosway Angie Rich Marketing Ho Lay Hong K061Ecosway One Lifestyle Eanterprise Pang Sooi San E24AEcosway TSTIEN Enterprise Toh Seng Tien K025Ecosway Wui Global Trading Wui Zun Lin C80BEcosway Teh Swee Shuan C46BEcosway Dinogold Resources Rozzana K046Ecosway Angellboey Enterprise Cheong Poh Yee K070Ecosway Jibli Baawa Enterprise Gowri AP Subramaniam D73CEcosway Leong Chi Enterprise F003Ecosway Vision Thirty Eight Enterprise Rosilani Binti Mat Zin K076Ecosway Siti Hajar Binti Yahaya H44AEcosway June Lim Marketing Lim Hooi Jiun F015Ecosway Happy Lifestyle Trading & Services Sabrina Wong C033Ecosway Wealth Growth Enterprise Ang Yan Bee E44AEcosway Mission One Thousand Enterprise Ng Hooi Ee K023Ecosway D A Multi Dynamic Hew Mei Fong D12AEcosway MM Trading And Services C071Ecosway Suzliati Irni Sulaiman F67AEcosway Chai Woon Yew K05AEcosway Priscilla Chiang SGWEcosway Lee Yoke Lum C56CEcosway Tung Soo Kin C76AEcosway R Komathi AP S Rajangam H40BEcosway E L Marketing Low Peh Hun E049Ecosway Eco Synergy Enterprise Ng Kwai Kuen E066Ecosway D'Premier Solutions Lee Swee Yung E29BEcosway Khiam Ann Trading D036Ecosway Cheong Lee Moi SG64Ecosway Rich Global Trading & Services Siti Hajar K056Ecosway S Yoon Resources Hon Kar Ho C26BEcosway Ideal Vixionz Enterprise Helen Wong K53AEcosway JJ Excellence Enterprise Gan Jess See D002Ecosway Afna Integrated Resources Nur'Aishikin K29AEcosway Tan Siew Ling SG41Ecosway Coswin Resources G030Ecosway SBBS Resources Cheong Poh Yee H50AEcosway Trade Secret Heng Soong Sim Alisa C068Ecosway Chong Chon Heng K09AEcosway Tan Yan Chee E15AEcosway Kazado Marketing Chan Yuet Wan K080Ecosway Dina Permai Enterprise Adilah Binti Ahmad Zanuri H069Ecosway Ang Yee Teng D064Ecosway Freeport Ventures Susan Tee Ong Bee D13EEcosway SMF Grand Marketing Rohani G44BEcosway Soon Gaik Eng H063Ecosway DJS Power Network Koh Lih Cheng K087Ecosway Pang Fui Moi C87DEcosway Sister Venture Nuriyah K030Ecosway Green Lite Marketing Tan Chee Hang K049Ecosway Lim Tow Leong J98BEcosway Sunshine Greening Enterprise Lau Sheon Yee K11AEcosway Positive Global Trading Lydia Binti Mohd Ali K098Ecosway Healthy Hua Enterprise Teoh Poh Im C074Ecosway Pn Sudarseh Bt Mohd Bisri SL72Ecosway Ling Lee Ping F08CEcosway Lee Chew Peng F78BEcosway C & P Ecos Two Enterprise Tan Pey Jye F73CEcosway Smartex Trading Pauline Lee Kim Lan C016Ecosway Proway Venture V.Maareeammal AP Vattumalai K069Ecosway DMSOL Enterprise Chua Yi Keat E70AEcosway Loh Lee Kuan C90AEcosway Leen Network Mktg Usnita Bt Saruni @ Basir SL74Ecosway Qisha Sh Enterprise Sarse C77CEcosway Radiant Impression Trading Chia Yue Fah D076Ecosway Ng Chung Sin K052Ecosway Tai Sook Boon K078Ecosway Vanessa Lai Nyet Moi K079Ecosway Rania Rich & Health Marketing Siti Amirah G48CEcosway Chew Sze Tau Andrew M003Ecosway Enrich Goodwill Enterprise Phua Chin Swee K22AEcosway Nor Dayana Binti Nor Affandi F30BEcosway Suriyatiey Binti Ibrahim C09BEcosway ABG Network Enterprise Lim Wai Kuen G002Ecosway Rosmawati Binti Mohamed Yusoff J047Ecosway Eco Healthy Enterprise Catharina Chau K055Ecosway EC Way Mktg Khor Tuan Sim SG63Ecosway Marlina Binti Md Yusof H82AEcosway Claire Concepts Ent Shereen Chan Poh Geok E060Ecosway Chin Lee Hwa C32BEcosway Jsyen Care Ho Swee Yen H20CEcosway Seng Huat Marketing Ricky Soo & Brian Soo SL71Ecosway Mei E Marketing Choo Mei Hoong K04AEcosway Lyna Binti Abdullah G63AEcosway SLWin Enterprise SL75Ecosway SNN Brothers Enterprise Parthiban K07AEcosway Angel Trading & Services F012Ecosway Jessie Paul Enterprise Ho Swee Er K088Ecosway Pancarsel Global Norhusaini M004Ecosway Koh Bee Hwa C06AEcosway Mega Plus Marketing Lo Sweee Lan K060Ecosway Trade Success Enterprise Ng Hui Shan H09BEcosway Beauty Life Marketing Ent Yap Siew Fenn SG97Ecosway Mesirah Binti Sarman H086Ecosway Yik & Lim Enterprise Lim Kim Peng D28AEcosway Premier Grow Enterprise Tan Jan Wee J001Ecosway Chai Weng Leong K054Ecosway Pong Keok Hun C075Ecosway Syarikat Perniagaan Yee Yee Meo Cheng H024Ecosway Lee Yee Sun Enterprise Lee Yee Sun C49CEcosway E & R Marketing EnterpriseTeh Poh Chin D46CEcosway Zambala Enterprise Oh Saw Ping H073Ecosway Loo Hooi Yong SG70Ecosway World Linkeage Marketing Janice Lee & Ben Liew K051Ecosway Mutiara Azaziz Enterprise D05AEcosway Lua Soo Keng TGXEcosway Ismariana Enterprise Noraina Mariana Binti Ibrahim K002Ecosway Citra Indah Ent Zaida Binti Ahmad TGPEcosway Fizmy Ent Norlia TGLEcosway Gema Nsa Ent Sharifah Bt Omar & Noridawati Bt Omar TGVEcosway Nur Amalina Binti Zulfelkeri K073Ecosway Fong Lee Ping TGZEcosway Siti Fatinah TGH 

Popular Wellness Products in Negeri Sembilanview moreThe Body Shop Jusco Seremban 2 Shopping CentreRank 2094 of 2224Skin Care Product in Seremban 2Optical Arts-TESCO Seremban 2Rank 1830 of 2224Eye wear product in SerembanEcosway Lee Beng Chu D89ARank 543 of 2224Healthcare product in SerembanEcosway KFML Harvest Trading Chong Mei Li F48ARank 515 of 2224Healthcare product in SerembanTags car care  kitchen and cookware  personal care  health and nutrition  food & beverages  household cleaning  bodyshaping lingerie  cosmetics & frangrances  water systems  undergarments & apparel Service Area Mantin  Negeri Sembilan DescriptionClaim businesseCosway (launched in 2002) is a rapidly growing international company with headquarters in the prestigious golden triangle of Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia and thousands of Sales Centres located throughout Asia, Australia, UK and US. We are a subsidiary of Cosway, Malaysia (founded in 1979), and a member of the Berjaya Group - a top conglomerate in Asia that has companies and investments in several major sectors, such as: Property Investment & Development, Hotels & Resorts, Gaming & Lottery, Financial Services, Consumer Marketing, Retailing, Vacation Time-Sharing Travel, Food & Beverage Establishments and Education.
Product /Price InfoWe offer you a wide range of exclusive, innovative quality products that are competitively priced. Categories include: 

Health and Nutrition
Household Cleaning
Car Care
Personal Care
Cosmetics & Fragrances
Kitchen and Cookware
Bodyshaping Lingerie, Undergarments and Apparel
Food and Beverages
Water Systems.

We have dedicated full-time teams sourcing and developing products so that our products continuously resonate with the wants and needs of the market. This helps us to consistently meet our goals of providing you with the best and latest quality products at affordable prices.
1 Reviews





Ecosway (Main) Ecosway Yen Mee Yun H31A (Branch) 

Quality


Friendliness


Value of Money


Availability










3.0QualityFriendlinessValue of MoneyAvailabilityVariety of product but i am not interesting at all. the product look dull. 0   0   January 10, 2017 by nurnadia  



Opening HoursMonday09:30~21:30 Tuesday09:30~21:30 Wednesday09:30~21:30 Thursday09:30~21:30 Friday09:30~21:30 Saturday09:30~21:30 Sunday09:30~21:30 Other Wellness ProductsAvon JET JEWELLERY   Rank 167 of 2224 Ecosway KFML Harvest Trading Chong Mei Li F48A  Rank 515 of 2224 SK II PARKSON SEREMBAN PARADE   Rank 1991 of 2224 Avon TWO IN ONE COLLECTION   Rank 189 of 2224 Ecosway TLM Trdg, Doris Tee NS24  Rank 778 of 2224 View MoreOther CategoriesFashion  [ 3105 ] Telecommunication  [ 4211 ] Food Drink  [ 5528 ] Car  [ 2481 ] Electronic Gadget  [ 5267 ] Wellness Products  [ 2224 ] Finance [ 3664 ] Grocery [ 4105 ] Petrol Station [ 2918 ] Book / Gift [ 613 ] Lottery Agent [ 1508 ] Hardware Shop [ 2190 ] + More Categories 













Close


User Sign inYou must login to give Review / Enquire





 




User Sign Up









OR


Login with Facebook




Forget Password?
Sign Up
Sign In 





Quality (6.0/10) Friendliness(6.0/10) Value of Money(6.0/10) Availability(6.0/10)   




Subscribe to our newsletter here


 







Copyright © 2017 LookP Services. All rights reserved.
















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











	PERFECTRON Trademark of Yen-Yun Ting. Serial Number: 85126824 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Computer & Software Products & Electr...
PERFECTRON










 
Get FREE email alerts













PERFECTRON  Trademark Information
 Yen-Yun Ting
Amusement apparatus adapted for use with television receivers only; Calculating machines; Camcorders; Cash registers; Cassette players; Computer central processing units; Electronic chips for the manufacturer of integrated circuits; Compact disc players; Computer game programs; Computer memories; Computer operating programs, recorded; Computer peripheral devices; Computer programs for editing images, sound and video; Computer programs used for...




Perfect for these industries

Computer & Software Products & Electrical & Scientific Products





Words that describe this mark
amusement   apparatus   adapted   use   television   receivers   calculating   machines   camcorders   cash   registers   cassette   players   central   processing   units   electronic   chips   manufacturer   integrated   circuits   compact   disc   players   game   programs    
                                    




This is a brand page for the PERFECTRON trademark by Yen-Yun Ting 
                                in HSIN-TIEN CITY, , .
Write a review about a product or service associated with this PERFECTRON trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Yen-Yun Ting of the PERFECTRON trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the PERFECTRON trademark.
                           






On Friday, September 10, 2010,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        PERFECTRON by 
                        Yen-Yun Ting, HSIN-TIEN CITY.
                        The USPTO has given the PERFECTRON 
                        trademark serial  number of  85126824.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is CONTINUED USE AND INCONTESTIBILITY ACCEPTED.
                        The correspondent listed for PERFECTRON is 
                        
                        
                                            Joe McKinney Muncy of 
                                            Muncy, Geissler, Olds & Lowe, P.C.,  4000 Legato Road, Suite 310 Fairfax, VA 22033
                                .
                            The PERFECTRON trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Computer & Software Products & Electrical & Scientific Products
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for PERFECTRON 
                            is Amusement apparatus adapted for use with television receivers only; Calculating machines; Camcorders; Cash registers; Cassette players; Computer central processing units; Electronic chips for the manufacturer of integrated circuits; Compact disc players; Computer game programs; Computer memories; Computer operating programs, recorded; Computer peripheral devices; Computer programs for editing images, sound and video; Computer programs used for electronic cash register systems; Downloadable operating software and driver software for computer motherboards; Computer-gaming software; Computers; Computer disc drives; Blank magnetic discs; Electronic pens; Electronic pocket translators; Downloadable electronic publications in the nature of magazines and newsletters in the field of games; Electronic tags for goods; Facsimile machines; Hand-held electronic games adapted for use with television receivers only; Hologram apparatus; Horns for loudspeakers; Blank integrated circuit cards; Integrated circuits; Interoperable communication system designed to provide radio, streaming video, wireless internet, and VOIP phone; Computer interface boards; Laptop computers; Computer monitors; Computer software to monitor and control factory manufacturing processes; Computer cursor control devices, namely, computer mouse; Notebook computers; Electronic notice boards; Blank optical discs; Personal stereos; Photocopiers; Pocket calculators; Portable telephones; Printed circuits; Printers for use with computers; Slide or photograph projection apparatus; Bar code readers; Chip card readers; Electronic memory card readers; Flash card readers; RFID readers; Optical character readers; Audio-receivers and video-receivers; Satellite navigational system, namely, a global positioning system (GPS); Scanners; Digital camera accessory in the nature of a digital photo viewer; Semi-conductors; Video screens; Video telephones; Silicon wafers; Word processors. 
                            





Word mark:
 PERFECTRON


  Status/Status Date:  


CONTINUED USE AND INCONTESTIBILITY ACCEPTED

6/20/2017



  Serial Number:  
85126824


  Filing Date:  
9/10/2010


 Registration Number:  
4032665 


 Registration Date:  
9/27/2011


 Goods and Services: 
Amusement apparatus adapted for use with television receivers only; Calculating machines; Camcorders; Cash registers; Cassette players; Computer central processing units; Electronic chips for the manufacturer of integrated circuits; Compact disc players; Computer game programs; Computer memories; Computer operating programs, recorded; Computer peripheral devices; Computer programs for editing images, sound and video; Computer programs used for electronic cash register systems; Downloadable operating software and driver software for computer motherboards; Computer-gaming software; Computers; Computer disc drives; Blank magnetic discs; Electronic pens; Electronic pocket translators; Downloadable electronic publications in the nature of magazines and newsletters in the field of games; Electronic tags for goods; Facsimile machines; Hand-held electronic games adapted for use with television receivers only; Hologram apparatus; Horns for loudspeakers; Blank integrated circuit cards; Integrated circuits; Interoperable communication system designed to provide radio, streaming video, wireless internet, and VOIP phone; Computer interface boards; Laptop computers; Computer monitors; Computer software to monitor and control factory manufacturing processes; Computer cursor control devices, namely, computer mouse; Notebook computers; Electronic notice boards; Blank optical discs; Personal stereos; Photocopiers; Pocket calculators; Portable telephones; Printed circuits; Printers for use with computers; Slide or photograph projection apparatus; Bar code readers; Chip card readers; Electronic memory card readers; Flash card readers; RFID readers; Optical character readers; Audio-receivers and video-receivers; Satellite navigational system, namely, a global positioning system (GPS); Scanners; Digital camera accessory in the nature of a digital photo viewer; Semi-conductors; Video screens; Video telephones; Silicon wafers; Word processors


 Mark Description: 
The mark consists of the word "PERFECTRON" in stylized font.


 Type Of Mark: 
TradeMark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
3/1/2011


Last Applicant/Owner:

Yen-Yun TingHSIN-TIEN CITY
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Drawing with Words in Stylized form


 Design Search: 


(NO DATA)



Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 (NOT AVAILABLE)


 Correspondent:


Joe McKinney Muncy
Muncy, Geissler, Olds & Lowe, P.C.
4000 Legato Road
Suite 310
Fairfax, VA 22033





 Use in Commerce Trademark - Applicant has provided proof of use of this mark in commerce to USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (009) - Scientific, nautical, surveying, photographic, cinematographic, optical, weighing, measuring, signalling, checking (supervision), life-saving and teaching apparatus and instruments; apparatus and instruments for conducting, switching, transforming, accumulating, regulating or controlling electricity; apparatus for recording, transmission or reproduction of sound or images; magnetic data carriers, recording discs; automatic vending machines and mechanisms for coin operated apparatus; cash registers, calculating machines, data processing equipment and computers; fire extinguishing apparatus.


First Use Anywhere: 
4/17/2011


First Use In Commerce: 
5/25/2011





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your PERFECTRON trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

6/20/2017
CONTINUED USE AND INCONTESTIBILITY ACCEPTED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



Joe McKinney Muncy


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of PERFECTRON trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search perfectron on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for PERFECTRON 




PERFECTRON is providing Amusement apparatus adapted for use with television receivers only; Calculating machines; Camcorders; Cash registers; Cassette players; Computer central processing units; Electronic chips for the manufacturer of integrated circuits; Compact disc players; Computer game programs; Computer memories; Computer operating programs, recorded; Computer peripheral devices; Computer programs for editing images, sound and video; Computer programs used for electronic cash register systems; Downloadable op....
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 


































YEN YUN 





























































Home 
Member details








Y





                            YEN YUN
                        
Bandar Sri Damansara | KUL
Member Since : 07 Jul 2015






Reviews by: yen yun




date
likes







 








NESCAFÉ Mountain Wash®



(2 years ago)




                        I'm a coffee lover. I can't to work without drinking a cup of coffee everyday. Hope I can stand for a chance to try to this innovated brand of Nescafe.
                        
                    


 yen yun

                            Bandar Sri Damansara | KUL
                        







0




2.1K





Post comment to:


 Facebook
 Twitter
 Google+
















Load more products












Learn & Win
Share the details of the product you’d like us to list in New Product Watch below.
Success!
 












Submit



 






Brand Power Spotlights

Helping you buy better

VIEW MORE






RECOMMEND APRODUCT

Have you found a hot new product you want other...
VIEW MORE


HOME TESTED PRODUCTS
This is where our members register for new sample
VIEW MORE



 








×
 Terms & Conditions 



The use of the Sites is subject to the following terms and  conditions, the <Privacy Statement> and any additional terms and conditions, rules, disclaimers  and notices displayed by us elsewhere on the Sites from time to time (together,  "Terms of Use"). By using the Sites, you agree to be bound by the Terms of Use as  updated from time to time, whether you are a visitor simply browsing the Sites  or you become a member of the BG community (both, "Users"). If you do not agree with any of the  terms contained in the Terms of Use, do not use the Sites. For the purposes of the Terms of Use the word “Sites” includes, without limitation,:  this site; all websites, co-branded  microsites, services, or applications owned or provided by Buchanan Advertising  (Australia) Pty. Ltd. ACN 155 718 942 (“BG”), and all services offered on or through www.hometesterclub.com, and other services accessible via www.hometesterclub.com or via other websites owned, operated or  provided by BG; all mobile phone  applications and other media owned, operated or provided by BG; all software offerings  and applications owned or provided by BG and/or available on or through www.hometesterclub.com or other websites, mobile phone applications  and other media owned, operated or provided by BG; and all webpages, data,  text, images, photographs, graphics, audio, video, and documents including,  without limitation, offers and coupons, marketing materials, press releases,  white papers, product data sheets, and other information and content on or  through or submitted on or through www.hometesterclub.com or other websites, mobile phone applications  and other media owned, operated or provided by BG.  For the purposes of the Terms of Use "Related Entity" means any of Buchanan Group Holdings  Pte Ltd, Buchanan Licensing Singapore Pte Ltd, Buchanan Advertising (UK) Ltd,  Buchanan Advertising (Canada) Inc, and BG Advertising (Malaysia) Sdn Bhd Related  Bodies Corporate, Joint Venture partners and Licensees from time to time.  Use of the Sites                    The Sites are owned, operated or provided by BG and are designed to provide a  place for Users to access and share homemaker knowledge and experience through  forums, articles, videos and product reviews. The information and material on  the Sites is provided “as is” for general informational purposes only. Users  access the Sites, and rely on the information and material contained in the  Sites, at their own risk.   MembershipTo participate in  certain parts of the Sites, Users must register on the Sites as a member of the  BG community. Users who register as a member of the BG community must provide  BG with complete and up-to-date registration information, as requested. It is  each User's responsibility to inform BG of any changes to their registration  information, by updating the details in their member profile page. BG may, in its sole discretion, terminate or suspend Users' membership of the  BG community immediately without notice for any reason, including if Users  breach any of the Terms of Use. Users may terminate their membership by  deactivating their membership on their member profile page. However, Users will  continue to be bound by the Terms of Use for as long as they continue to use  the Sites. Uers who register as members of the BG community will be issued a user-name  and password. Users must keep their password secure and confidential and are  responsible for any activities or actions conducted under their user-name. By subscribing for membership on this Site you are subscribing for membership  encompassing each of the BG Sites. As a member you will be able to access each  of the BG websites and enjoy the privileges of a member. Any comments you post  on a BG Site may be used on any of the Sites. User-posted content Some parts of the Sites may allow Users to submit, upload, post or transmit  content or material such as text, photos, images, audio and video (including  links to content or material) (“Material”) that may be accessed and viewed by others via the Sites. Users  are responsible for any Material they submit to the Sites and must respect the  legal rights and sensibilities of other Users.                    BG reserves the right to (but has no obligation to) review, remove, edit,  modify, deny access to or not display any Material submitted, uploaded, posted  or transmitted to or on the Sites in its sole discretion.                    By submitting, uploading, posting or transmitting Material to or on the Sites,  Users: grant BG a fully paid,  royalty free, perpetual, transferable, worldwide licence to (and to authorise  others to) use, copy, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish, translate, create  derivative works from, distribute, publicly perform and display such Material  (modified or unmodified) for the purposes of operating the Sites and providing  any associated services to Users and any promotional purposes of BG and its  clients (for example, BG may reproduce testimonials in promotional materials  for its own use or that of its clients (which may or may not include the  relevant user name)) consent to BG using  and publishing (and authorising others to use and publish) their name,  character, likeness, image, voice or anything else that identifies them which  is contained in the Material for the above purposes grant other Users a  royalty free, fully paid, perpetual, worldwide licence to use, copy and  reproduce such Material for their own private, non-commercial use represent and warrant  that they are legally entitled to submit, upload, post or transmit the Material  to or on the Sites and have obtained all necessary licences, consents and  approvals in relation to the Material (including intellectual property licences  and in relation to the use of any name, character, likeness, image, voice or  anything else that identifies any person that is included in the Material) to  enable them to submit, upload, post or transmit the Material on the Sites and  to permit BG and Users to deal with the Material in accordance with the  licences granted above without infringement or violation of any third party  rights represent and warrant  that they provide BG with accurate, truthful and complete registration  information and consent to any act or  omission that would otherwise infringe their moral rights in the Material and  present and future rights of a similar nature conferred by statute anywhere in  the world. No liability for  misuse by third parties                    BG does not warrant that Material submitted, uploaded, posted or transmitted by  Users will be protected against misuse by third parties. In particular, BG is  not responsible for the infringement of the copyright in Material by other  Users. Conduct of Users                     Users must not submit, upload, post or transmit Material on the Sites: that contains  advertising, spam or is otherwise submitted, upload, posted or transmitted for  commercial purposes (except where expressly permitted by BG) about a product or  service that they own or are otherwise associated with (including if they are  an employee or agent of the supplier) that is offensive,  unlawful, harmful, indecent, defamatory, false or misleading, untruthful or  inaccurate, discriminatory, unsuitable for minors or of an abusive, obscene,  offensive or menacing nature that contains nudity,  sexual activity, swear words or excessive violence or is otherwise  inappropriate as determined by BG in its sole discretion that is reasonably  likely to offend another User that violates or  infringes (or the use of which violates or infringes) the intellectual property  (including without limitation any patent, trademark, trade secret or copyright)  or other rights of any person or entity that contains personal  information of any person (such as name, address, email address, phone number),  or any third parties’ likenesses except with the relevant person's permission that contains software  viruses or other computer codes, files, worms or programs that are designed or  intended to disrupt, disable, damage, limit or interfere with the proper  function of any software, hardware or telecommunications equipment or to damage  or obtain unauthorised access to any system data, password or other information  of BC or any third party that imposes or may  impose (as determined by BG in its sole discretion) an unreasonable or  disproportionately large load on BG’s (or its third party providers’)  infrastructure or                    that contains financial, legal, medical or other professional advice.  Users must not use the Sites to:  conduct any illegal  activity; cause annoyance or  inconvenience to any person including other Users; or harvest information  about Users for the purpose of sending, or to facilitate the sending of,  unsolicited commercial electronic messages. Material posted by other UsersBG is not responsible for, and accepts no liability with respect to, any  Material submitted, uploaded, posted or transmitted on the Sites.                    The views and opinions expressed in Material posted by Users on the Sites are  the views and opinions of the authors and do not necessarily represent the  views or opinions of BG or its clients. BG does not endorse or support any  views or opinions posted by Users on the Sites or guarantee the accuracy,  completeness, currency or suitability of any information posted by Users. NEW Number Membership of Home Tester Club If you sign up to become a home tester in the Home Tester Club, from time to  time, BG may send to you samples of products (Samples) for you to test. You agree and acknowledge to the fullest extent permitted by law that: BG is under no  obligation to send you any Samples at any time BG has no liability to  you in respect of the Samples and you will not make a  claim against BG for any Samples not received or received in a damaged  condition. you will not sell, or  attempt to sell, any of these samples to any third party.  BG advises you not to accept the delivery of,  or use, any Samples that appear damaged or tampered with in any way. In such  circumstances, please contact the local Home Tester Club team. In the event  that Samples are returned to us undelivered for any reason, including human  error, or are otherwise not delivered to you BG will be under no obligation to  redeliver the Samples.    CompetitionsBG may run  competitions from time to time on the website.  All competitions will be subject to the terms  and conditions specific to the competition, which are available to view on the  website.  To enter the competitions you must  accept the terms and conditions of the contest . Reporting  violations By using the Sites, Users may be exposed to Material submitted, uploaded,  posted or transmitted by other Users that may be offensive, indecent or  objectionable. Users agree that BG is not liable for the opinions or behaviour  of other Users, including any Material they submit, upload, posted or transmit  on the Sites and any defamatory statements or offensive conduct.                     Users who believe that the behaviour or Material of another User is  objectionable or contrary to the Terms of Use can report the behaviour or  Material to BG by using the "Report" button at the relevant place on  the Sites or contacting BG (click <here > for contact details).   Disclaimer of warranties and representations                    Except as required by law, BG gives no express or implied warranties or  guarantees, and makes no representations, in relation to the Sites. In  particular, while care has been taken in creating the Sites, BG does not  warrant or represent that: the information or any  material provided on the Sites is accurate, complete, up to date or suitable  for any purpose this Sites are free  from any computer viruses or other defects or User's access to the  Sites will be continuous or uninterrupted. Limitation of BG's Liability                    Where conditions, warranties or consumer guarantees implied or applied by law  cannot be excluded, BG limits its liability, where it is entitled to do so, to  the resupply of the relevant service, or paying the User the cost of that  resupply. Otherwise, to the maximum extent permitted by law, BG and its  officers, employees, agents and representatives will not be liable for any loss  or damage (including consequential loss or damage) to any person or entity,  however caused (whether by negligence or otherwise), which may arise directly  or indirectly in respect of any error, omission or misrepresentation in any  information or material provided on the Sites or otherwise as a result of or in  connection with the use of the Sites or any information or material provided on  the Sites. Links to third party  websites                     The Sites may contain links to other websites that are not operated or  controlled by BG. Those links are provided for convenience only and may not be  current. Provision of a link should not be construed as an endorsement or  approval of the third party website by BG.                     BG is not responsible for the content of third party websites, which are not  covered by the Terms of Use. Users access those websites at their own risk.  Third party websites should have their own Terms of Use, which BG encourages  Users to read.   Availability and Use                    Users must ensure that their access to, and use of, the Sites, is not illegal  or prohibited by laws which apply to them or in their location.                     BG reserves the right to change or remove any feature of the Sites at any time.                      Indemnity                    Users indemnify, and hold harmless, BG and its related parties in relation to  all liabilities, loss, expenses and damage whatsoever which is suffered  (including but not limited to indirect or consequential loss) by BG and its  related parties as a direct or indirect result of the User acting  inconsistently with or breaching any part of the Terms of Use. BG reserves the  right (at its complete discretion) to assume the exclusive defence and control  of any matter subject to indemnification by you in which event the user must  assist and cooperate with BG in asserting any available defences. Age of Users                    Users must be 18 years or over or otherwise use the Sites with parental or  guardian consent and supervision. Copyright                    Copyright in the material in this website is owned by BG or its licensors.  Users may download information from the Sites and print out that information, but only for their own  private, non-commercial use. Otherwise, except as permitted by the Copyright Act 1968 (Cth), no part of the Sites (including  any Material posted on this website) may be reproduced, copied, published,  framed, or transmitted in any form or by any means without the prior written  consent of BG. Requests for consent should be directed to BG. Click <here> for contact  details. Intellectual Property                    We (or our associated or affiliated companies or third parties who have  licensed its brands to BG or contributed to the Sites) ("Content Owner") own, license or have permission to use  from third parties all content of the Sites. All content of the Sites remains  the sole property of the applicable Content Owner and is protected under all  relevant copyright, trademark and other applicable laws. Nothing on the Sites  should be construed as granting any license or rights to use or distribute any  content of the Sites outside of the Sites, without our express written  agreement or of the other applicable Content Owner. Jurisdiction                    The content, operation and interpretation of this website and the Terms of Use  will be governed by the laws of Victoria, Australia. The User agrees to submit  to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of the Courts of Victoria in the event of a  dispute arising out of, or in connection with, this website.  Changes to these terms and conditions                    BG may amend these terms and conditions from time to time by posting the  amended version on this website. It is your responsibility to check these terms  and conditions periodically for changes. Subsequent or continuing use of the  Sites will constitute acceptance of any changes.                      If any part of the Terms of Use is or becomes void, it will not affect the  validity and enforceability of the remaining provisions. The void part will be  replaced by provisions that are valid and have an effect as close as possible  to the effect of the void part.  Updated September 2012



Close










×Close
Sign into Your Account
Not a member yet? Register now — it's Free



 

 Sign in with Facebook
            

 Sign in with Twitter
                

 Sign in with Google+
                

 Sign in with Amazon
                    








Facebook
Google
Amazon
Twitter
Yahoo



OR EMAIL

 






 Login





 Keep me logged in
                    



Forgot your password?


 














×






Yes
No










×






Ok










×
Page error



                    There seems to be an error with the page. Please click on Ok button to reload the page
                


Ok






















Loading...
















Yen Yun Huey
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Yen Yun Huey, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Yen Yun Huey

Yen Yun Huey exports to Tomyeh through the port of Vancouver Bc        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Yen Yun Huey and millions of other manufacturers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 TOYS R-US (WAREHOUSE #0083)
 FRITO LAY DOMINICANA, S.A.         
 ADIDAS INDUSTRIAL
 DELL PRODUCTS
 CABELA-S HONG KONG LIMITED
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Yen Yun Huey
Yen Yun Huey exports to Tomyeh through the port of Vancouver Bc


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



YEN YUN HUEY
NO.19-2, SINING N. RD., DATONG DISTRICT, TAIPEI, CITY 103, TAIWAN R.O.C.


TOMYEH
141 WORTHING AVE. MARKHAM, L3S 4K2 ON CANADA TORONTO ON CA



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



TOMYEH
141 WORTHING AVE. MARKHAM, L3S 4K2 ON CANADA TORONTO ON CA



NO MARKS
NO MARKS





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number










Product Description




MIXER MACHINE 
MIXER MACHINE 









Bill of LadingCHQFCTPC06010853Arrival Date2006-02-11Weight (LB)2,787Weight (KG)1,267UnitsCMQuantity1267 KGVoyage No.N/APort of LoadingKAOHSIUNGPort of DischargeVANCOUVER BCVessel NameORIENT OVERSEAS CONTAINER LINECarrier CodeCHQFCountry Of OriginTaiwan 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Yen Yun Huey. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Yen Yun Huey has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Yen Yun Huey







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Yen Yun Huey
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Pam Wozney M.e. Dey & Co., Inc.                                



                                    Kathem Mutlaq Maraqa Heirs Co                                



                                    Caribe Diesel Sas                                



                                    Translink C/o Cubic Transportation                                



                                    Vishnu Agro Foods                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.3224
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X





















YUN Probiotherapy products questions and FAQ










































































 






  

 





















 




























  


















PRODUCT QUESTIONS
















  










Product questions








How sensitive is the microbiome? Will one wash with soap remove my bacterial layer immediately?
 
 Washing with soaps with aggressive preservatives and emulsifiers diminishes your skin bacteria. Luckily our skin bacteria can take a hit and often naturally restore themselves in persons with a healthy skin. However, on the longer term it might alter your natural skin’s microbiome, making it more prone to skin concerns.
 



What does ‘biome-safe’ or ‘biome-friendly’ actually mean?
 
 Most soaps, shampoos and skin care products contain preservatives, emulsifiers and perfumes that are bad for your skin’s microbiome. We searched and selected specific preservatives, emulsifiers and perfumes that aren’t bad for the skin’s microbiome. 
 



What is the science behind YUN and how do the bacteria in the therapies work?
 
 Our first scientific challenge was to find the most effective bacteria to fight the bad bacteria and fungi that cause skin problems. Our research team identified a number of friendly bacterial strains that are strong enough and that don’t damage the skin’s natural balance. These patented YUN bacteria, YUN-V1.0, YUN-V2.0 and YUN-S1.0, have been proven to be strong enough to fight off problem-causing bacteria on your skin. 
We came up with a revolutionary system to keep our bacteria alive in a skin cream. Brand new processes and compositions were developed to ensure these live bacteria maintain their activity after being processed into skin care products: our bacteria are kept in a sleep-like state in tiny microcapsules. Once you apply them to your skin, the microcapsules pop open and our good bacteria start fighting the bad organisms. 
Finally, we developed a range of washes and creams that are either free from preservatives and emulsifiers, or contain only gentle preservatives and emulsifiers that do not harm your skin’s microbiome. As the gentle preservatives become inactive when applied to the skin, they are safe for your protective layer of friendly bacteria. The YUN bacteria are specifically selected to fight off the bad bacteria through competition.  With YUN Probiotherapy the natural balance of the skin’s bacteria is restored and safeguarded.
 
 



Do you use chemicals in your products?
 
 From a scientific point of view, all molecules are considered ‘chemicals’. The ingredients in all YUN products are specifically selected for their safety.
 



Do you test on animals?
 
 We most definitely do not test on animals. There are no other special ingredients used but bacteria and we can assure you that they are safe.
 



Can these bacteria cause any harm if ingested?
 
 Our bacteria are specifically selected for their safety profile and will not harm you if ingested. But, for immunocompromised patients we recommend not to use any products before consulting a doctor.
 



Do all YUN Probiotherapy products need to be refrigerated?
 
 No, but the curative creams with live bacteria in our ACN and ACN+ therapies have a prolonged shelf life when it’s refrigerated. This is not necessary as longs as you respect its expiration date. All other products can be stored at room temperature. 
 



What side-effects should I expect when starting probiotics?
 
 Probiotics are generally well tolerated. You may experience an increase in spots in the first few days using YUN’s ACN and ACN+ Probiotherapy. These symptoms occur when your skin and microbiome are still rebalancing in favour of the good bacteria, after which you should see skin improvement.
 



What does it mean if a product has been dermatologically approved? Is your product dermatologically approved?
 
 The term “dermatologist-tested” simply means that the product was reviewed by a dermatologist, a doctor who specialises in treating the skin. The YUN therapies with live active probiotics are dermatologically tested at the University Hospital of Antwerp, in Belgium. To be absolutely sure you’re using the best products for your skin, consult your own dermatologist. 
 



Can I find information about the clinical tests?
 
 The results of the clinical trials will be further analysed and we will work on the publication of these results in scientific journals. Results will be available on the website after publication.
 



Are your products safe to use during a pregnancy or for children?
 
 Yes, all our probiotherapies are safe for children and during pregnancy. 
 



How do I use the products?
 
 Every therapy must be applied to the problem zone on the skin. See the leaflet for detailed instructions. For an online detailed instructions for use for  a specific YUN Probiotherapy, click here. 
 



How can I get the most out of my products?
 
 Just simply follow the provided instructions carefully.
 



Do I have to use YUN products for ever?
 
 YUN believes in the importance of the naturally present microbiome to protect us and prevent skin and vaginal issues. Using YUN products will safeguard these important body associated bacteria. If you stop using your specific YUN Probiotherapy and start using other products there is a possibility those other products contain elements which damage or completely remove good bacteria from your skin, which could have consequences to your skin’s condition. 
 



What about travelling with my YUN products?
 
 You can easily take your YUN products with you when travelling. Please do keep in mind that some products with a volume higher than 100ml, which depends on the authorities, might not be allowed in your hand luggage.
 



Do I need a prescription for this product?
 
 No, none of the YUN Probiotherapies are medicinal therapies and thus requires no prescription.
 



How often do I have to use YUN Probiotherapy?
 
 You will get the best results out of YUN Probiotherapy when using our products on a daily basis, just follow the provided instructions.
 



Where can I purchase YUN Probiotherapy?
 
 Go to our webshop where you can buy your favourite therapy online or use the YUN Probiotherapy store locator to find resellers in your neighbourhood.
 



Is it necessary to cleanse my skin twice a day before I use the bacterial cream?
 
 It isn’t specifically necessary to cleanse your skin twice a day but it is very important to use YUN’s facial and body washes to cleanse your face and body instead of any other soaps, shampoos or showering gels. They might be harmful for your skin’s microbiome and remove the good bacteria that our therapies contain.
 



Can I still use moisturisers, makeup, deodorant or sunscreen?
 
 It is recommended to not mix YUN products with other products on your skin. Other products are often not tested to be biome friendly. Moisturisers, makeup and deodorants can diminish the effect of the YUN therapy. We would recommend the YUN SKN body cream and SKN face cream instead of other moisturisers. Makeup is not tested to be biome-friendly and therefore it is preferable to not mix it with YUN products on the skin.  Deodorants contain lots of perfume and alcohol which are not biome-safe, even though deodorant is not supposed to be used on the areas where YUN products are used. Sunscreen, however, is always very important to use to protect yourself if needed. Wait for a minimum of 30 minutes after you’ve applied YUN before you use sunscreen. 

 



Does it work as an anti-ageing or anti-wrinkles product?
 
 There are several reasons for an ageing skin; oxidative stress, dehydration and dry skin. Agressive soaps harm the acid mantle and the bacteria on top of your skin. By attacking these protective layers, the dehydration of the skin accelerates which results in (more) wrinkles. YUN’s SKN Therapy is especially designed to protect these layers and to inhibit dry skin. Even though we haven’t added any active anti-ageing components, we do believe that the SKN products help the skin to maintain healthy and young.
 
 


















  

















PRODUCT QUESTIONS




ORDER & PAYMENT




PROFESSIONAL RESELLER























 ABOUT YUN
We have made sustainable skincare our mission in life.  New developments in DNA sequencing have allowed us to develop groundbreaking new treatments.  YUN relies on probiotics to combat harmful bacteria in a natural way.  Love your bacteria. We do. 
 


 SUBSCRIBE TO OUR NEWSLETTER









Please select your area of interest:

    Teen Acne
    Adult Acne
    Athlete's Foot
    General Skin Care
    Vaginal Infection


















Start typing and press Enter to search






 












 




















Home Tester Club















































































 










Previous



Next






TRY PRODUCTS
TEST and SHARE products for FREE at home.




REVIEW & SHARE
Review the latest products.




GET REWARDED
Unlock achievement badges to enhance your experience.



RECEIVED  A PRODUCT?
Ready to complete your survey?Here is what to do now.



×Close
 Share your thoughts on holiday shopping and WIN a $100 Supermarket Gift Card SIGN-UP NOW!



Products members have tested











 269
 225


Ellips Hair Vitamin
Beautiful, strong & healthy hair isn’t just a dream. Try Ellips Hair Vitamin with Pro-Keratin...














J









C









 409
 374


Cetaphil Baby Moisturising Bath & Wash
With Cetaphil Baby Moisturising Bath and Wash, you get to clean your baby’s skin with a formula...









N




R









F









 1K
 22
 959













8.8



Sensodyne Repair & Protect
A clinically proven toothpaste to protect your teeth














J



















 572
 2
 494













8.4



Guardian Baby Care Soft Wipes
Guardian Baby Care Soft Wipes is Dermatologically Tested & Proven to provide the ultimate care...














A



















 1K
 1
 1K













8.8



Johnson's® Milk Bath and lotion
Bath and Lotion that are specially formulated for your toddler’s skin.









A




T



















 510
 499













8.4



NANKID® OPTIPRO® 3
A Formulated Milk to help your child build a strong foundation.




S




Y




K









N









 556
 1
 496













8.6



Mind 'n Spirit SHINE Dishwashing Liquid
New experience with Aromatherapy dishwashing liquid




N




N
























 542
 1
 493













8.5



Super-K Laundry Liquid Detergent
A laundry detergent that fights tough stains effectively









N




R




N




N












Brand Power Spotlights

Helping you buy better

VIEW MORE





NEW PRODUCT WATCH



Find out what's new in stores.

VIEW MORE



Member Review







Hot New Products

 



 31
 12
 4.0


Garnier Duo Clean Whitening Smoothening ...
Garnier Duo Clean Whitening Smoothening Facial Foam cleanses your skin...







 23
 8
 4.3


Darlie Charcoal X Spiral Toothbrush
Darlie Charcoal X Spiral Toothbrush with 0.01mm spiral bristles and designed...







 3
 1
 5.0


Lifree Ultra Slim Pants
Light and Comfortable
Easy to wear and change
Powerful absorption
Soft...







 27
 15
 4.1


Pantene Pro-V Anti Dandruff Shampoo
Suffer from hair dandruff all the time? Time to change to Pantene Pro-V Anti...







 25
 1
 5.0


Palmer’s All-Over Body Firming Lotion
Palmer’s All-Over Body Firming Lotion helps to tone and tighten skin. It...







 12
 9
 4.4


Enfagrow A+ Step 3
For your kid to be future-ready and successful, he/ she need development for...







 28
 10
 4.3


Simplot Wedges Spicy Seasoning
No time prepare for dinner but need a quick bite? If you love potato, here...





PRODUCTS CATEGORIES HIGHLIGHT






Fresh and Frozen

Simplot Wedges Spicy Seasoning


VIEW MORE






Hygiene

Dettol Foam Hand Wash
Lifree Ultra Slim Pants
Kotex Fresh Liners Regular Scented Daun Sirih Extract


VIEW MORE



Bathroom

Dove Volume Nourishment Shampoo


VIEW MORE






Baby and Infant

Pureen ABD Anti Bacterial Detergent Liquid
Enfagrow A+ Step 3
Drypers Wee Wee Dry - Thin core layer


VIEW MORE






 








×
 Terms & Conditions 



The use of the Sites is subject to the following terms and  conditions, the <Privacy Statement> and any additional terms and conditions, rules, disclaimers  and notices displayed by us elsewhere on the Sites from time to time (together,  "Terms of Use"). By using the Sites, you agree to be bound by the Terms of Use as  updated from time to time, whether you are a visitor simply browsing the Sites  or you become a member of the BG community (both, "Users"). If you do not agree with any of the  terms contained in the Terms of Use, do not use the Sites. For the purposes of the Terms of Use the word “Sites” includes, without limitation,:  this site; all websites, co-branded  microsites, services, or applications owned or provided by Buchanan Advertising  (Australia) Pty. Ltd. ACN 155 718 942 (“BG”), and all services offered on or through www.hometesterclub.com, and other services accessible via www.hometesterclub.com or via other websites owned, operated or  provided by BG; all mobile phone  applications and other media owned, operated or provided by BG; all software offerings  and applications owned or provided by BG and/or available on or through www.hometesterclub.com or other websites, mobile phone applications  and other media owned, operated or provided by BG; and all webpages, data,  text, images, photographs, graphics, audio, video, and documents including,  without limitation, offers and coupons, marketing materials, press releases,  white papers, product data sheets, and other information and content on or  through or submitted on or through www.hometesterclub.com or other websites, mobile phone applications  and other media owned, operated or provided by BG.  For the purposes of the Terms of Use "Related Entity" means any of Buchanan Group Holdings  Pte Ltd, Buchanan Licensing Singapore Pte Ltd, Buchanan Advertising (UK) Ltd,  Buchanan Advertising (Canada) Inc, and BG Advertising (Malaysia) Sdn Bhd Related  Bodies Corporate, Joint Venture partners and Licensees from time to time.  Use of the Sites                    The Sites are owned, operated or provided by BG and are designed to provide a  place for Users to access and share homemaker knowledge and experience through  forums, articles, videos and product reviews. The information and material on  the Sites is provided “as is” for general informational purposes only. Users  access the Sites, and rely on the information and material contained in the  Sites, at their own risk.   MembershipTo participate in  certain parts of the Sites, Users must register on the Sites as a member of the  BG community. Users who register as a member of the BG community must provide  BG with complete and up-to-date registration information, as requested. It is  each User's responsibility to inform BG of any changes to their registration  information, by updating the details in their member profile page. BG may, in its sole discretion, terminate or suspend Users' membership of the  BG community immediately without notice for any reason, including if Users  breach any of the Terms of Use. Users may terminate their membership by  deactivating their membership on their member profile page. However, Users will  continue to be bound by the Terms of Use for as long as they continue to use  the Sites. Uers who register as members of the BG community will be issued a user-name  and password. Users must keep their password secure and confidential and are  responsible for any activities or actions conducted under their user-name. By subscribing for membership on this Site you are subscribing for membership  encompassing each of the BG Sites. As a member you will be able to access each  of the BG websites and enjoy the privileges of a member. Any comments you post  on a BG Site may be used on any of the Sites. User-posted content Some parts of the Sites may allow Users to submit, upload, post or transmit  content or material such as text, photos, images, audio and video (including  links to content or material) (“Material”) that may be accessed and viewed by others via the Sites. Users  are responsible for any Material they submit to the Sites and must respect the  legal rights and sensibilities of other Users.                    BG reserves the right to (but has no obligation to) review, remove, edit,  modify, deny access to or not display any Material submitted, uploaded, posted  or transmitted to or on the Sites in its sole discretion.                    By submitting, uploading, posting or transmitting Material to or on the Sites,  Users: grant BG a fully paid,  royalty free, perpetual, transferable, worldwide licence to (and to authorise  others to) use, copy, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish, translate, create  derivative works from, distribute, publicly perform and display such Material  (modified or unmodified) for the purposes of operating the Sites and providing  any associated services to Users and any promotional purposes of BG and its  clients (for example, BG may reproduce testimonials in promotional materials  for its own use or that of its clients (which may or may not include the  relevant user name)) consent to BG using  and publishing (and authorising others to use and publish) their name,  character, likeness, image, voice or anything else that identifies them which  is contained in the Material for the above purposes grant other Users a  royalty free, fully paid, perpetual, worldwide licence to use, copy and  reproduce such Material for their own private, non-commercial use represent and warrant  that they are legally entitled to submit, upload, post or transmit the Material  to or on the Sites and have obtained all necessary licences, consents and  approvals in relation to the Material (including intellectual property licences  and in relation to the use of any name, character, likeness, image, voice or  anything else that identifies any person that is included in the Material) to  enable them to submit, upload, post or transmit the Material on the Sites and  to permit BG and Users to deal with the Material in accordance with the  licences granted above without infringement or violation of any third party  rights represent and warrant  that they provide BG with accurate, truthful and complete registration  information and consent to any act or  omission that would otherwise infringe their moral rights in the Material and  present and future rights of a similar nature conferred by statute anywhere in  the world. No liability for  misuse by third parties                    BG does not warrant that Material submitted, uploaded, posted or transmitted by  Users will be protected against misuse by third parties. In particular, BG is  not responsible for the infringement of the copyright in Material by other  Users. Conduct of Users                     Users must not submit, upload, post or transmit Material on the Sites: that contains  advertising, spam or is otherwise submitted, upload, posted or transmitted for  commercial purposes (except where expressly permitted by BG) about a product or  service that they own or are otherwise associated with (including if they are  an employee or agent of the supplier) that is offensive,  unlawful, harmful, indecent, defamatory, false or misleading, untruthful or  inaccurate, discriminatory, unsuitable for minors or of an abusive, obscene,  offensive or menacing nature that contains nudity,  sexual activity, swear words or excessive violence or is otherwise  inappropriate as determined by BG in its sole discretion that is reasonably  likely to offend another User that violates or  infringes (or the use of which violates or infringes) the intellectual property  (including without limitation any patent, trademark, trade secret or copyright)  or other rights of any person or entity that contains personal  information of any person (such as name, address, email address, phone number),  or any third parties’ likenesses except with the relevant person's permission that contains software  viruses or other computer codes, files, worms or programs that are designed or  intended to disrupt, disable, damage, limit or interfere with the proper  function of any software, hardware or telecommunications equipment or to damage  or obtain unauthorised access to any system data, password or other information  of BC or any third party that imposes or may  impose (as determined by BG in its sole discretion) an unreasonable or  disproportionately large load on BG’s (or its third party providers’)  infrastructure or                    that contains financial, legal, medical or other professional advice.  Users must not use the Sites to:  conduct any illegal  activity; cause annoyance or  inconvenience to any person including other Users; or harvest information  about Users for the purpose of sending, or to facilitate the sending of,  unsolicited commercial electronic messages. Material posted by other UsersBG is not responsible for, and accepts no liability with respect to, any  Material submitted, uploaded, posted or transmitted on the Sites.                    The views and opinions expressed in Material posted by Users on the Sites are  the views and opinions of the authors and do not necessarily represent the  views or opinions of BG or its clients. BG does not endorse or support any  views or opinions posted by Users on the Sites or guarantee the accuracy,  completeness, currency or suitability of any information posted by Users. NEW Number Membership of Home Tester Club If you sign up to become a home tester in the Home Tester Club, from time to  time, BG may send to you samples of products (Samples) for you to test. You agree and acknowledge to the fullest extent permitted by law that: BG is under no  obligation to send you any Samples at any time BG has no liability to  you in respect of the Samples and you will not make a  claim against BG for any Samples not received or received in a damaged  condition. you will not sell, or  attempt to sell, any of these samples to any third party.  BG advises you not to accept the delivery of,  or use, any Samples that appear damaged or tampered with in any way. In such  circumstances, please contact the local Home Tester Club team. In the event  that Samples are returned to us undelivered for any reason, including human  error, or are otherwise not delivered to you BG will be under no obligation to  redeliver the Samples.    CompetitionsBG may run  competitions from time to time on the website.  All competitions will be subject to the terms  and conditions specific to the competition, which are available to view on the  website.  To enter the competitions you must  accept the terms and conditions of the contest . Reporting  violations By using the Sites, Users may be exposed to Material submitted, uploaded,  posted or transmitted by other Users that may be offensive, indecent or  objectionable. Users agree that BG is not liable for the opinions or behaviour  of other Users, including any Material they submit, upload, posted or transmit  on the Sites and any defamatory statements or offensive conduct.                     Users who believe that the behaviour or Material of another User is  objectionable or contrary to the Terms of Use can report the behaviour or  Material to BG by using the "Report" button at the relevant place on  the Sites or contacting BG (click <here > for contact details).   Disclaimer of warranties and representations                    Except as required by law, BG gives no express or implied warranties or  guarantees, and makes no representations, in relation to the Sites. In  particular, while care has been taken in creating the Sites, BG does not  warrant or represent that: the information or any  material provided on the Sites is accurate, complete, up to date or suitable  for any purpose this Sites are free  from any computer viruses or other defects or User's access to the  Sites will be continuous or uninterrupted. Limitation of BG's Liability                    Where conditions, warranties or consumer guarantees implied or applied by law  cannot be excluded, BG limits its liability, where it is entitled to do so, to  the resupply of the relevant service, or paying the User the cost of that  resupply. Otherwise, to the maximum extent permitted by law, BG and its  officers, employees, agents and representatives will not be liable for any loss  or damage (including consequential loss or damage) to any person or entity,  however caused (whether by negligence or otherwise), which may arise directly  or indirectly in respect of any error, omission or misrepresentation in any  information or material provided on the Sites or otherwise as a result of or in  connection with the use of the Sites or any information or material provided on  the Sites. Links to third party  websites                     The Sites may contain links to other websites that are not operated or  controlled by BG. Those links are provided for convenience only and may not be  current. Provision of a link should not be construed as an endorsement or  approval of the third party website by BG.                     BG is not responsible for the content of third party websites, which are not  covered by the Terms of Use. Users access those websites at their own risk.  Third party websites should have their own Terms of Use, which BG encourages  Users to read.   Availability and Use                    Users must ensure that their access to, and use of, the Sites, is not illegal  or prohibited by laws which apply to them or in their location.                     BG reserves the right to change or remove any feature of the Sites at any time.                      Indemnity                    Users indemnify, and hold harmless, BG and its related parties in relation to  all liabilities, loss, expenses and damage whatsoever which is suffered  (including but not limited to indirect or consequential loss) by BG and its  related parties as a direct or indirect result of the User acting  inconsistently with or breaching any part of the Terms of Use. BG reserves the  right (at its complete discretion) to assume the exclusive defence and control  of any matter subject to indemnification by you in which event the user must  assist and cooperate with BG in asserting any available defences. Age of Users                    Users must be 18 years or over or otherwise use the Sites with parental or  guardian consent and supervision. Copyright                    Copyright in the material in this website is owned by BG or its licensors.  Users may download information from the Sites and print out that information, but only for their own  private, non-commercial use. Otherwise, except as permitted by the Copyright Act 1968 (Cth), no part of the Sites (including  any Material posted on this website) may be reproduced, copied, published,  framed, or transmitted in any form or by any means without the prior written  consent of BG. Requests for consent should be directed to BG. Click <here> for contact  details. Intellectual Property                    We (or our associated or affiliated companies or third parties who have  licensed its brands to BG or contributed to the Sites) ("Content Owner") own, license or have permission to use  from third parties all content of the Sites. All content of the Sites remains  the sole property of the applicable Content Owner and is protected under all  relevant copyright, trademark and other applicable laws. Nothing on the Sites  should be construed as granting any license or rights to use or distribute any  content of the Sites outside of the Sites, without our express written  agreement or of the other applicable Content Owner. Jurisdiction                    The content, operation and interpretation of this website and the Terms of Use  will be governed by the laws of Victoria, Australia. The User agrees to submit  to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of the Courts of Victoria in the event of a  dispute arising out of, or in connection with, this website.  Changes to these terms and conditions                    BG may amend these terms and conditions from time to time by posting the  amended version on this website. It is your responsibility to check these terms  and conditions periodically for changes. Subsequent or continuing use of the  Sites will constitute acceptance of any changes.                      If any part of the Terms of Use is or becomes void, it will not affect the  validity and enforceability of the remaining provisions. The void part will be  replaced by provisions that are valid and have an effect as close as possible  to the effect of the void part.  Updated September 2012



Close










×Close
Sign into Your Account
Not a member yet? Register now — it's Free



 

 Sign in with Facebook
            

 Sign in with Twitter
                

 Sign in with Google+
                

 Sign in with Amazon
                    








Facebook
Google
Amazon
Twitter
Yahoo



OR EMAIL

 






 Login





 Keep me logged in
                    



Forgot your password?


 














×






Yes
No










×






Ok










×
Page error



                    There seems to be an error with the page. Please click on Ok button to reload the page
                


Ok






















Loading...










 




THE MONKEY KING --- www.KungfuDVDWorld.com
















 
SEARCH 



All
Title
Actor
Director








Home  l  
	Welcome, Guest   l  Your Account   l   Register

Cart














  4.99 DVD CLOSE OUTS

  6.99 HORROR DVD SALE 

  USA DVDS

   anime plus dvds

  anime

  POSTERS 11X17

  Blu-ray

  BOX SETS

  EURO CULT

  New Releases

  english language

  The Venom

  Shaw Brothers

  Blaxplotation

  Thailand

  Cantonese-mandarin

  Korean

  Japanese

  Euro Cult

  French

  JET Li

  Bruce Lee

  Donnie Yen

  Gordon Liu 

  Alexander Fu Sheng

  Package Deal

  WHOLESALE BUYERS















  All our movies are
            digitally re-mastered,
            high quality, factory
            sealed & All Region







THE MONKEY KING

Home
» THE MONKEY KING





Starring: Donnie Yen, Yun-Fat Chow, Aaron Kwok |  
Large View
Sun Wukong, (The Monkey King) is a 
monkey born from a heavenly stone who 
acquires supernatural powers. After 
rebelling against heaven and being 
imprisoned under a mountain for 500 
years, he later accompanies the monk 
Xuanzang on a journey to India. Thus, 
according to legend, Buddhism is 
brought to ancient China. This much 
beloved story, is as much a part of 
Asian culture as The Iliad and The 
Odyssey or The Wizard of Oz are to the 
West. This first installment in a 
trilogy of live action 3-D movies is 
actually a prequel to The Journey To 
The West, the much told story of the 
Monkey King's adventures on the road 
to India. The Monkey King: Havoc In 
The Heavenly Palace will be released 
in the U.S. as The Monkey King. The 
first movie is the origins story - 
beginning with the birth of Sun Wukong 
and ending with his imprisonment for 
his crimes under the Five-Peaked 
Mountain. Along the way he acquires 
incredible powers, battling the armies 
of the gods and the armies of the 
demons to find his 
Duration: 0




Country: China | Hong Kong 

Language: Mandarin 

Release Date: 14 September 2014 (USA) See more ť  

Also Known As: The Monkey King: The Legend Begins

Runtime: 119 min 









Price $14.99








Carry On Shopping
People who bought this product also bought:

THE INVINCIBLE FOUR 2
Once Upon a Time in Shanghai
Tom yum goong 2 
UNBEATABLE 2013
Young Detective Dee: Rise of the Sea Dragon

Try these categories:

Cantonese-mandarin
Donnie Yen










 
  5. Holy Virgin vs The Evil Dead 











		    Shipping & Return

              Privacy Notice

              Conditions of Use

            Contact Us

		      Sitemap






 








